Hawaii statutes.
§346-164 Suspension and revocation of
licenses and permits; reissuance. Any license or temporary permit issued
under this subpart may be suspended or revoked by the department of human
services after due notice and hearing, the provisions for which shall be made
in the rules. However, upon a determination by the department that conditions
exist which constitute an imminent danger to the health, welfare, or safety of
the children cared for, a license or temporary permit may be immediately
suspended pending a hearing by the department as herein provided. The
department, in its discretion, may reissue a license or temporary permit which
has been suspended or revoked upon satisfying itself that minimum standards
have been or will be met. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next